Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1233.
hereby enacts as follows:PART IGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the General Appropriation Act of 2026.Section 102. State appropriations.The following sums specified in this act, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the General Fund to certain agencies of the Executive Department of the Commonwealth for the payment of salaries, wages or other compensation and travel expenses of the duly elected or appointed officers and employees of the Commonwealth, for the payment of fees for contractual services rendered, for the 1234567891011121314151617181920 purchase or rental of goods and services, printing, public advertising by or through any medium, equipment, land and buildings and for payment of any other expenses, as provided by law or by this act, necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities and for the purposes specified for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.PART IIGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSSUBPART AEXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSection 201. Department of Human Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026: Federal StateFor domestic violence programs.State appropriation....... 23,063,000PART LXXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 8101. Lapsing of unused funds.Except as otherwise provided by law or by this section, that part of all appropriations in Part II unexpended, uncommitted or unencumbered as of June 30, 2027, shall automatically lapse as of that date.Section 8102. Effective date.This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, 20260SB1233PN1700 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whichever is later.20260SB1233PN1700 - 3 - 1